New Jersey, session 222, S3017.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 23 Behavioral Health Services 7700 Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services GRANTS-IN-AID 09-7700  Addiction Services                                     $45,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services        $45,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 09 Opioid Hospital Inititaives ($45,000,000) Notwithstanding the provision of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Opioid Hospital Initiatives shall be distributed to the following hospitals, in the amounts indicated, and used for the purpose of providing necessary care and treatment for victims of opioid-related health issues consistent with the Opioid Recovery and Remediation Advisory Councils most recent strategic plan: $10 million to Hackensack, $15 million to RWJ Barnabas, $15 million to Cooper, and $5 million to Atlantic Health.  Each hospital, as a condition of receiving funds under this paragraph, shall submit a quarterly report to the Commissioner of Human Services until all funds received under this paragraph are expended, which report shall provide:  a description of the use of all funds expended, the number of individuals served under each use, outcomes data associated with the expended funds, the balance of any remaining funds, and any additional information required by the commissioner.  Consistent with CMS guidelines and subject to any required federal approval, the amounts appropriated pursuant to this paragraph may be utilized by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services to maximize federal Medicaid funds. 2.  Section 111 of P.L.2025, c.74 is repealed. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.